Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 15.1 Water Suppliers Subject to Commission Rate Regulation

39-15.1-1.
Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are to:

Augment current principles for setting the rates of public utilities that are water suppliers that are subject to commission rate regulation in a manner that facilitates:

Managing demand, especially seasonal demand;

Investing in infrastructure repair and replacement;

Recovering the full costs, including capital and operational, of water systems through water system revenues; and

Establishing operating capital and debt service of sufficient size; and

Provide an optional system for multiyear water rates that are adjustable in accordance with an approved rate plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 1.

39-15.1-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Agricultural” shall mean commercial agricultural producers as defined in §

46-15.3-4(2)

.

“Commission” shall mean the public utilities commission established by chapter 1 of this title, with all powers set forth in chapter 1 of this title, including, but not limited to, the powers set forth in §§

39-1-3

and

39-1-7

, and in chapter 4 of this title, and subject to the provisions of chapter 5 of this title.

“Division” shall mean the division of public utilities and carriers.

“Water resources board” shall mean the water resources board having the duties set forth in chapter 15 of title 46.

“Water supplier” shall mean all water supply systems regulated by the public utilities commission including the Kent County Water Authority, Newport Water Department, Pawtucket Water Supply Board, Providence Water Supply Board, United Water Rhode Island, Woonsocket Water Department, and any future water supply system that meets the definition established in §

39-1-2(a)(20)

pertaining to public utilities employed for the distribution of water to the consuming public.

“Water supply systems management plan” shall mean a water supply systems management plan prepared in accordance with §

46-15.3-5.1

and found by the water resources board, pursuant to the provisions of §

46-15.3-7.6

, to be in compliance with the requirements for such plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 1.

39-15.1-3.
Rates.

Adequacy. The rates of water suppliers subject to commission rate regulation shall be responsible and adequate to pay for all costs associated with water supply, including, but not limited to, the costs of:

Acquisition, treatment, transmission, distribution, and availability of water;

System administration and overhead, including the prudent cost and/or value of all services and facilities provided by the city or town to the water supplier, including, but not limited to, testing, operation, maintenance, replacement, repair, debt service, and associated with, but not limited to, supply, production, treatment, transmission, administration facilities, and metering and billing;

Programs for the conservation and efficient use of water, including costs of developing, implementing, enforcing, and evaluating the conservation programs and including conservation pricing as described in subsection (d);

Sufficient operating reserves, revenue stabilization funds, debt service reserves, and capital improvement/infrastructure replacement funds to implement water supply system management plans.

Equitability. Except for service charges and other fixed fees and charges approved as reasonable by the commission, where practicable, rates:

Shall be based on metered usage and fairly set among and within the classes and/or types of users;

Shall provide that within any class of users the full cost of system capacity, administration, operation, and water supply costs for peak and seasonal use is borne by the users that contribute to such peak and seasonal use; and

May provide a basic residential use rate for water use that is designed to make a basic level of water use affordable. Rates may require implementation of demand management practices, consistent with the standards and guidelines of the water resources board, established pursuant to §

46-15.8-5(1)

, by wholesale and retail customers.

Revenue stabilization. Water suppliers subject to commission rate regulation shall in the absence of other sufficient funds available for similar purposes, establish as part of their next general rate filing before the commission a revenue-stabilization account to ensure fiscal stability during periods when revenues decline as a result of implementing water conservation programs, or due to circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the water supplier, including, but not limited to, the weather and drought. A revenue-stabilization account shall accumulate a maximum of ten percent (10%) of the annual operating expenses of the supplier and shall be used to supplement other revenues so that the supplier’s reasonable costs are compensated. A supplier may draw upon its revenue-stabilization account without further action of the commission if revenues in any fiscal year fall below the level sufficient to provide reasonable compensation for services rendered, subject to periodic review by the commission to ensure that the purposes of §

39-15.1-1

are fulfilled.

Conservation. Water suppliers subject to commission rate regulation shall take effective action to reduce waste of water and to reduce non-agricultural seasonal increases in the use of water, and may adopt conservation pricing as part of a demand management program or otherwise revise their rates as a means to achieve their goals. For the purpose of encouraging conservation of water, suppliers are authorized to request increased rates based on quantity used either throughout the year or seasonally and to seek expedited review by the commission of such revised rates, provided that the supplier shall not have the burden of proof to link the increased rate to obtaining reasonable compensation for the service rendered as established in §

39-3-12

. Conservation pricing shall be designed to promote efficient water use, and to limit seasonal non-agricultural outdoor water use, and to the extent possible shall not increase prices for water users with no significant seasonal increase in water use. Revenues generated from the adoption of conservation rates shall be used to fund the revenue-stabilization account established pursuant to subsection (c) above, operating reserves, debt-service reserves or capital improvement/infrastructure replacement funds.

Billing. Billing shall be at a minimum quarterly by December 31, 2013.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 1.

39-15.1-4.
Optional multiyear rate plans.

Water suppliers may, at their discretion, file with the commission a rate plan for a period not to exceed six (6) years, which rate plans shall set forth proposed rates:

That are adequate, as described in §

39-15.1-3(a)

, to pay for all reasonable costs of service associated with water supply during the period of the plan, and may include projections of cost increases, and are equitable as described in §

39-15.1-3(b)

;

That attribute the cost of increased seasonal demand to customers who or that contribute to increased seasonal demand and that may include conservation pricing pursuant to §

39-15.1-3(d)

;

That provide for infrastructure maintenance, repair, and replacement, especially in order to meet goals for reduction of leakage and the accounting of non-billed water, that are included in a water supply systems management plan; and

That provide for the establishment and maintenance of operating reserves, capital reserves, and debt-service reserves as described in §

39-15.1-3(a)

.

The commission shall approve or reasonably amend the plan and the rates proposed therein.

A water supplier with a multiyear plan approved by the commission may change its rates consistent with provisions of the plan, provided that a forty-five (45) day notice is given to the commission and the division, which notice shall state the amount of the proposed rate changes, the manner in which the proposed rate is consistent with the approved plan, and the purpose of the proposed rate change. The proposed rate change shall be effective sixty (60) days after the notice to the commission and the division, unless the commission shall decide that the proposed rate increase may be unreasonable or inconsistent with the approved plan, in which case the commission shall hold a hearing on the proposed rate increase and may approve, or reasonably amend the proposed rate increase. Notwithstanding the foregoing notice provision, the commission shall be bound by the suspension period set forth in §

39-3-11

.

A water supplier may petition the commission for a modification to an approved plan, and the commission in hearing and deciding the petition need only consider those portions or elements of the plan affected by the proposed modification. The commission shall approve or reasonably modify the proposed modification. An approved modification shall become part of the plan for purposes of subsection (c) of this section.

Each water supplier with an approved plan shall report annually to the commission and the division with regard to performance under the plan, including rates, revenues derived from rates, expenditures necessary to pay for all reasonable costs of service; and the level and status of operating reserves, capital reserves, and debt-service reserves.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 1.